Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-155
Director or officer; interest in contract prohibited; accepting gratuity or bribe; penalty; forfeiture of office.

No director or any officer named in sections 46-101 to 46-1,111 shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom, nor shall receive any bonds, gratuity or bribe. For any violation of this provision, such officer shall be guilty of a Class IV felony, and conviction thereof shall work a forfeiture of his office.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 27, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 3485;

C.S.1922, § 2885;

C.S.1929, § 46-130;

R.S.1943, § 46-155;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 255.